Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-2,114
Act, how cited.

Sections 79-2,114 to 79-2,124 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Equal Opportunity in Education Act.

Laws 1982, LB 628, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-3001;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 118.

For applicability to postsecondary educational institutions, see sections 85-9,166 to 85-9,176.